Maryland, session 2026, HB0987.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0987*

HOUSE BILL 987
4–902.
(a) There is a Maryland Violence Intervention and Prevention Program Fund.
(e) (1) The Fund consists of:
(i) money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;
(ii) investment earnings of the Fund; and
(iii) money from any other source accepted for the benefit of the Fund.
(2) [(i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the Governor may
annually appropriate up to $10,000,000 to the Fund.
(ii) The Governor shall annually include in the annual budget bill an
appropriation composed of at least $3,000,000 in general funds to the Fund] FOR FISCAL
YEAR 2028 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE
IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF AT LEAST $10,000,000 TO THE
FUND.
4–905.
(c) [Funding] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION,
FUNDING awards shall be commensurate with:
(1) the levels of gun violence in the jurisdiction served by the local
government or nonprofit organization; and
(2) the strength of the local government or nonprofit organization’s
application.
(D) OF THE TOTAL AMOUNT AVAILABLE FOR GRANTS THROUGH THE FUND
IN EACH FISCAL YEAR:
(1) UP TO 40% SHALL BE ALLOCATED TO PROGRAMS SERVING THE
BALTIMORE REGION, COMPOSED OF BALTIMORE CITY AND BALTIMORE COUNTY;
(2) UP TO 40% SHALL BE ALLOCATED TO PROGRAMS SERVING THE
CAPITAL REGION, COMPOSED OF MONTGOMERY COUNTY AND PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY; AND

HOUSE BILL 987 3
(3) ANY REMAINING SHALL BE ALLOCATED TO OTHER JURISDICTIONS
DISPROPORTIONATELY AFFECTED BY VIOLENCE, AS DETERMINED BY THE
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.